Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FIRST-TIME HOMEBUYER, FEE-BASED HOME PURCHASE FINANCING.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency for the first-time homebuyer, fee-based home purchase financing program established in Laws 2023, chapter 37, article 2, section 12, as amended in Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 15, section 44. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end